Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 4 Abatement and Survival

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

1 Am. Jur. 2d Abatement, Survival and Revival §§ 52 to 109.

1 C.J.S. Abatement and Revival §§ 117 to 180.

§ 1-4-101.
Causes of action that survive.

In addition to the causes
of action which survive at common law, causes of action for mesne
profits, injuries to the person, an injury to real or personal estate,
or any deceit or fraud also survive. An action may be brought notwithstanding
the death of the person entitled or liable to the same, but in actions
for personal injury damages, if the person entitled thereto dies recovery
is limited to damages for wrongful death.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 28; R.S. 1887, § 2364; R.S. 1899, § 3447; C.S. 1910, § 4290; C.S. 1920, § 5559; R.S. 1931, § 89-402; C.S. 1945, § 3-402; Laws 1947, ch. 124, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-28; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision giving personal representative the right to bring new action when cause of action survives and timely suit failed otherwise than on the merits, see §

1-3-118

.

“Survival” defined. —

In the context of a survival action, “survive” means to continue to live or exist beyond the life, or existence of; to live through; to live on after passing through; to remain alive. Thus, this section cannot apply to harm allegedly done to an estate after death. Connely v. McColloch (In re Estate of Drwenski), 2004 WY 5, 83 P.3d 457,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2004).

Cause of action for personal injuries survives. —

Formerly, cause of action for purely personal injuries, caused by negligence of another, did not survive death of wrongdoer. Tuttle v. Short, 42 Wyo. 1, 288 P. 524,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1930).

By amendment in 1947 the legislature effectively permitted a cause of action for personal injuries to survive. Parsons v. Roussalis, 488 P.2d 1050,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1971).

Before the 1947 amendment to this section, which extended the section to personal injuries and added the proviso as to personal injury damages, it was held that this section did not authorize the personal representative of a person who had died from injuries to recover from the estate of a deceased wrongdoer for pecuniary losses suffered by the family of the injured person. Mull v. Wienbarg, 66 Wyo. 410, 212 P.2d 380,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1949). See §

1-39-101

.

Causes of action for damages or injury to persons and property survive

and are assignable, and consequently can be the subject of a claim for conventional subrogation. Northern Utils. Div. of K N Energy v. Evansville, 822 P.2d 829,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1991).

This section is ambiguous as to the applicability of language in second sentence beginning with “but.”

De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977).

What that language refers to. —

The language in the second sentence beginning with “but” refers to those cases where death results from the injuries complained of. De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977).

The language in the second sentence beginning with “but” does not attach to the words “injuries to the person” under circumstances other than wrongful death actions where the negligence causes the death. De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977).

Cause survives where death due to unconnected illness. —

A cause of action for personal injuries survives under this section where the injured party dies of an illness unconnected with the alleged negligence of a defendant. De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977).

It is not reasonable to relate wrongful death recovery to negligent acts not causing death. De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977).

Where a person is injured by another, if he dies from other causes, an action for personal injury survives; however, if death results from the same injuries, the action may not be maintained by the personal representative for the estate, but may be brought under the wrongful death act for the next of kin. Robinson v. Pacificorp, 10 P.3d 1133,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 2000).

Where decedent's death is due to wrongful injuries, suit is permitted

under either this section or §§

1-38-101

and

1-38-102

.Parsons v. Roussalis, 488 P.2d 1050,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1971).

But recovery is limited to that stemming from wrongful death.
—

pain and suffering of the decedent, according to the words of this section, having no part in establishing damages. Parsons v. Roussalis, 488 P.2d 1050,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1971).

Complete remedy for wrongful death not allowed. —

Wyoming's survival statute with its language in the second sentence beginning with “but” is unique in that it does not allow a complete remedy for wrongful death as in other jurisdictions. De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977).

Both a recovery for the estate and a recovery for the survivors are not available in wrongful death actions because of the language in the second sentence of this section which begins with “but.” De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977).

Distinctions between survival and wrongful death statutes.
—

The prime difference between survival and wrongful death statutes is that the survival statute merely continues a cause of action in existence. The injured party's claim after death is an asset of the estate, while the wrongful death statute creates a new cause of action for the benefit of designated persons who have suffered the loss of a loved one and provider. De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977); Rosa v. Cantrell, 705 F.2d 1208,

1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 23413

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 821, 104 S. Ct. 85, 78 L. Ed. 2d 94, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 1117 (U.S. 1983).

Survival statutes permit the personal representative of the deceased to prosecute any claims for personal injury the deceased would have had but for his death but do not permit recovery for harms suffered by the decedent's family as a result of his death. De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977).

The survival statute protects the creditors of the estate; the Wrongful Death Act does not. De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977).

Quoted

in

Rodriguez v. Casey, 2002 WY 111, 50 P.3d 323,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Taylor v. Estate of Taylor, 719 P.2d 234,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 557

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Should a Wrongful Death Action Expire Before the Decedent Does? A Wrong Turn for Wrongful Death,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 235 (2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Survival of action for invasion of right of privacy, 14 ALR2d 750, 57 ALR3d 16.

Survival of action based on delay in passing upon application for insurance, 32 ALR2d 487.

Claim for negligently damaging or destroying personal property as surviving tortfeasor's death, 40 ALR2d 533.

Statutory liability for physical injuries inflicted by animal as surviving defendant's death, 40 ALR2d 543.

Death of beneficiary as affecting right of action under death statute, 43 ALR2d 1291.

Survival of obligation of guaranty, 41 ALR2d 1213.

Action or claim for punitive damages as surviving death of person wronged, 63 ALR2d 1327.

Death as terminating coexecutor's, coadministrator's or testamentary cotrustee's liability for defaults or wrongful acts of fiduciary in handling trust or estate, 65 ALR2d 1019.

Survivability of cause of action created by civil rights statute, 88 ALR2d 1153.

Survival of cause of action under Civil Damage Act, 94 ALR2d 1140.

Survivability of action for libel by will, 21 ALR3d 754.

Death of putative father as precluding action for determination of paternity or for support of illegitimate child, 58 ALR3d 188.

Recovery, in action for benefit of decedent's estate in jurisdiction which has both wrongful death and survival statutes, of value of earnings decedent would have made after death, 76 ALR3d 125.

Validity of exception for specific kind of tort action in survival statute, 77 ALR3d 1349.

Products liability: forklift trucks, 95 ALR3d 541.

Judgment in favor of, or adverse to, person injured as barring action for his death, 26 ALR4th 1264.

Claim for punitive damages in tort action as surviving death of tortfeasor or person wronged, 30 ALR4th 707.

Defamation action as surviving plaintiff's death, under statute not specifically covering action, 42 ALR4th 272.

When is death “instantaneous” for purposes of wrongful death or survival action, 75 ALR4th 151.

Right of workers' compensation insurer or employer paying to a workers' compensation fund, on the compensable death of an employee with no dependants, to indemnity or subrogation from proceeds of wrongful death action brought against third-party tortfeasor, 7 ALR5th 969.

Excessiveness or inadequacy of punitive damages awarded in personal injury or death cases, 12 ALR5th 195.

Wrongful death damages for loss of expectancy of inheritance from decedent, 42 ALR5th 465.

Survival of action or cause of action based on violation of antitrust laws, 11 ALR Fed 963.

§ 1-4-102.
Abatement
of actions by death.

No action or proceeding
pending in any court abates by the death of either or both of the
parties thereto except as herein provided; an action for libel, slander,
malicious prosecution, assault, assault and battery or nuisance shall
abate by the death of either party.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 195; R.S. 1887, § 2531; R.S. 1899, § 3622; C.S. 1910, § 4477; C.S. 1920, § 5747; R.S. 1931, § 89-1227; C.S. 1945, § 3-2301; W.S. 1957, § 1-29; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to limitation of actions for libel, slander, assault, battery and malicious prosecution, see §

1-3-105

.

For provision that proceedings on orders of attachment shall not abate if the defendant dies or a defendant corporation loses its charter, see §

1-4-101

.

For provision that cause of action for wrongful death survives the death of the person liable, see §

1-38-101

.

As to criminal nuisances, see §

6-6-201

et seq.

As to substitution of parties when one dies, see Rule 25, W.R.C.P.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “battery or nuisance” for “battery, nuisance, or against a justice of the peace for misconduct in office.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Section is expressly limited to pending actions

and cannot be construed as referring to actions which have not yet been commenced. Mull v. Wienbarg, 66 Wyo. 410, 212 P.2d 380,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1949).

Time to bring appellate proceedings not suspended. —

Statutes dealing with revivor of actions after death of a party do not suspend running of time limit within which appellate proceedings must be brought to view judgment or final order of trial court. Rowray v. McCarthy, 48 Wyo. 108, 42 P.2d 54,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1935).

Death of appellant after original decision on appeal

had been rendered does not require substitution of appellant's heirs and administrator as parties, on respondent's motion for substitution and petition for rehearing, under this section, where former opinion would not be disturbed. Lovejoy v. Lovejoy, 38 Wyo. 358, 267 P. 91,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1928).

Death statutes. —

Sections

1-39-101

and

1-39-102

are not mere survival statutes and recovery may be had though deceased died instantaneously. Coliseum Motor Co. v. Hester, 43 Wyo. 298, 3 P.2d 105,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1931).

Successor in trust as party. —

By analogy to the practice in the district court under the code, the successor in trust would seem to be a proper party. Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 1, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1907).

Sufficiency of affidavit. —

An affidavit by a third person, who seeks to be substituted as plaintiff in ejectment, which states that during pendency of the action the original plaintiff transferred, by warranty deed, all her interest in the premises to the applicant, and then died, and that the applicant is now the owner of the property, does not state with sufficient clearness a case entitling applicant to substitution, since deed, while absolute in terms, may be in effect only a mortgage, a mere colorable conveyance, void for want of consideration, or procured by duress or fraud. Smith v. Harrington, 3 Wyo. 503, 27 P. 803,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1891); Smith v. City of Cheyenne, 3 Wyo. 513, 27 P. 807,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1891).

Upon forfeiture of charter of corporation, pending action against it was not abated,

but could proceed in the corporate name, as general laws governing revivor of actions are not controlling. Lusk Lumber Co. v. Independent Producers Consol., 43 Wyo. 191, 299 P. 1044,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1931).

Applied

in

Parsley v. Wyoming Automotive Co., 395 P.2d 291,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1964).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Medical malpractice action as abating upon death of either party, 50 ALR2d 1445.

Abatement or survival of action for attorney's malpractice or negligence upon death of either party, 65 ALR2d 1211.

Recovery, in action for benefit of decedent's estate in jurisdiction which has both wrongful death and survival statutes, of value of earnings decedent would have made after death, 76 ALR3d 125.

Validity of exception for specific kind of tort action in survival statute, 77 ALR3d 1349.

Libel by newspaper headline, 95 ALR3d 660.

Bells, carillons and the like as nuisance, 95 ALR3d 1268.

Effect of death of beneficiary upon right of action under death statute, 13 ALR4th 1060.

Defamation action as surviving plaintiff's death, under statute not specifically covering action, 42 ALR4th 272.

Abatement of state criminal case by accused's death pending appeal of conviction — modern cases, 80 ALR4th 189.